Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3725.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin CENTENNIAL OFFICE BUILDING SITE REDEVELOPMENT.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriations. new text end new text begin (a) $12,500,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the commissioner of administration for Phase 1 of capital improvements to the Centennial Office Building site on the Capitol complex. This appropriation includes money for design, demolition of the Centennial Office Building, and other site preparation work needed to facilitate redevelopment of the site. new text end new text begin (b) $1,500,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of administration for mechanical, electrical, and life safety modifications in the Freeman Office Building on the Capitol complex to prepare for the relocation of the cellular Distributed Antenna System from the Centennial Office Building to the Freeman Building, and to relocate associated fiber optic infrastructure. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $12,500,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end